District of Columbia statutes.
28-4602

Registration statement.

(a)

A consumer credit service organization that operates in the District shall:

(1)

Register with the Mayor by filing, on a form prescribed by the Mayor, a registration statement and paying a registration fee of $300; and

(2)

Pay an annual fee of $200 before April 2 of each subsequent year or at any other time established by regulation.

(b)

If there is a change in any of the information provided in the registration statement, the registrant shall report the change in writing to the Mayor within 10 days of the change.

(c)

If, in the opinion of the Mayor, the registration statement fails to disclose sufficient information required by this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, the registrant shall file in writing any additional information requested by the Mayor. The Mayor shall not accept the registration statement until all the requested information is furnished.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-236, § 3, 38 DCR 306
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(ff), 44 DCR 1271
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3302, 48 DCR 6981
This section is referenced in § 28-4606.
1981 Ed., § 28-4602.
D.C. Law 14-28 rewrote subsec. (a) which had read as follows: “(a) A consumer credit service organization that operates in the District shall: (1) Register with the Mayor; and (2) On a form prescribed by the Mayor, file a registration statement with the Mayor.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3002 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).